de: Kompatibilität mit Polizeiausrüstung: Bodycam-Dockingstation/Vorbereitung; Dashcam-Halterung/Vorbereitung; Montagesockel für Frontkonsole; Waffenhalterung/Vorbereitung; K-9-Paket; Lichtbalken-Vorverkabelung; Keine; Trennwand für Gefangenentransport; Vorbereitet für Rammstoßstange; Funkgeräte-Vorverkabelung; Ohne Rücksitzbank; Dachträger-Ausrüstungshalterungen; Sirenen-/Lautsprecher-Vorverkabelung; Suchscheinwerfer (A-Säule); Kofferraum-Ausrüstungseinsatz; Sonstige
es: Admisión de equipamiento policial: Preparación/estación para cámara corporal; Soporte/preparación para cámara de tablero; Base de montaje para consola frontal; Soporte/preparación para armero; Paquete K-9; Precableado para barra de luces; Ninguno; Separador para transporte de prisioneros; Preparación para defensa de empuje; Precableado para radio; Eliminación de asiento trasero; Soportes de equipo para portaequipajes de techo; Precableado para sirena/altavoz; Reflector (pilar A); Bandeja de equipo para maletero; Otro
vi: Trang bị thiết bị cho cảnh sát: Chuẩn bị/đế gắn camera đeo người; Giá treo/chuẩn bị gắn camera hành trình; Đế gắn bảng điều khiển phía trước; Giá treo/chuẩn bị gắn giá để súng; Gói K-9; Đi dây sẵn cho thanh đèn; Không có; Vách ngăn vận chuyển tù nhân; Sẵn sàng gắn cản trước; Đi dây sẵn cho bộ đàm; Bỏ ghế sau; Giá treo thiết bị trên nóc xe; Đi dây sẵn cho còi hụ/loa phát thanh; Đèn rọi (Cột A); Khay thiết bị trong cốp xe; Khác
zh-TW: 警用裝備適配: 隨身攝影機底座/預留; 行車紀錄器支架/預留; 前控制台安裝底座; 槍架安裝/預留; 警犬套件; 排燈預接線; 無; 囚犯運送隔板; 防撞桿預留; 無線電預接線; 拆除後座; 車頂架設備支架; 警報器/擴音器預接線; 探照燈 (A 柱); 後車廂設備托盤; 其他
cs: Příslušenství k vybavení policie: Dokovací stanice / příprava na osobní kameru; Držák / příprava na palubní kameru; Montážní základna přední konzole; Držák / příprava na stojan na zbraně; Paket K-9; Příprava kabeláže pro světelnou rampu; Žádná; Přepážka pro přepravu vězňů; Příprava na přední ochranný rám; Příprava kabeláže pro vysílačku; Odstranění zadních sedadel; Úchyty na vybavení na střešní nosič; Příprava kabeláže pro sirénu/PA systém; Hledáček (A-sloupek); Přihrádka na vybavení v kufru; Jiné
tr: Polis ekipmanı uyumluluğu: Yaka kamerası yerleştirme/hazırlık; Araç kamerası montajı/hazırlık; Ön konsol montaj tabanı; Silah askısı montajı/hazırlık; K-9 paketi; Tepe lambası ön kablolaması; Yok; Mahkum taşıma bölmesi; İtme tamponu hazır; Telsiz ön kablolaması; Arka koltuksuz; Tavan rafı ekipman montaj aparatları; Siren/anons sistemi ön kablolaması; Spot lambası (A sütunu); Bagaj ekipman tepsisi; Diğer
zh-CN: 警用装备适配: 执法记录仪基座/预留接口; 行车记录仪支架/预留接口; 前控制台安装底座; 枪架支架/预留接口; 警犬套件; 警灯预布线; 无; 囚犯运输隔离网; 防撞保险杠预留; 无线电预布线; 取消后座; 车顶行李架设备支架; 警报器/扩音器预布线; 聚光灯（A 柱）; 后备箱设备托盘; 其他
bg-BG: Комплект за полицейско оборудване: Докинг станция/подготовка за телесна камера; Стойка/подготовка за видеорегистратор; Монтажна основа за предна конзола; Стойка/подготовка за багажник за оръжие; Оборудване за полицейски кучета (K-9); Окабеляване за светлинна сигнализация; Няма; Преграда за транспортиране на задържани; Подготовка за преден ролбар; Окабеляване за радио; Премахната задна седалка; Монтажни елементи за багажник на покрива; Окабеляване за сирена/високоговорител; Прожектор (А-колона); Табла за оборудване в багажника; Други
fi: Poliisin varusteiden asennus: Haalarikameran telakka/valmius; Kojelautakameran kiinnike/valmius; Etukonsolin asennusalusta; Asetelineen kiinnike/valmius; K-9-paketti; Valopaneelin esijohdotus; Ei mitään; Vankikuljetuksen väliseinä; Karjapuskurivalmius; Radion esijohdotus; Takapenkin poisto; Kattotelineen varustekiinnikkeet; Sireenin/kuulutusjärjestelmän esijohdotus; Kohdevalo (A-pilari); Tavaratilan varustealusta; Muu
ro-RO: Montarea echipamentelor de poliție: Stație/pregătire cameră de corp; Suport/pregătire cameră de bord; Bază de montare pentru consola frontală; Suport/pregătire rastel pentru arme; Pachet K-9; Pre-cablare rampă luminoasă; Fără; Perete despărțitor pentru transport deținuți; Pregătit pentru bară de protecție (push bumper); Pre-cablare stație radio; Eliminare banchetă spate; Suporturi echipament pentru portbagaj de plafon; Pre-cablare sirenă/sistem PA; Proiector (stâlpul A); Tavă echipament portbagaj; Altele
nl: Politie-uitrusting pasvorm: Bodycam-docking/voorbereiding; Dashcam-houder/voorbereiding; Bevestigingsvoet middenconsole voor; Wapenrek-houder/voorbereiding; K9-pakket; Lichtbalk-voorbereiding; Geen; Tussenschot arrestantenvervoer; Pushbar-voorbereiding; Radio-voorbereiding; Achterbank weggelaten; Apparatuurhouders imperiaal; Sirene/PA-voorbereiding; Zoeklicht (A-stijl); Apparatuurlade kofferbak; Overig
th: การติดตั้งอุปกรณ์ตำรวจ: แท่นชาร์จ/จุดเตรียมกล้องติดตัว; ฐานยึด/จุดเตรียมกล้องหน้ารถ; ฐานยึดคอนโซลหน้า; ฐานยึด/จุดเตรียมชั้นวางปืน; แพ็กเกจ K-9; เดินสายไฟแถบไฟล่วงหน้า; ไม่มี; ฉากกั้นขนย้ายผู้ต้องขัง; รองรับกันชนเสริมด้านหน้า; เดินสายไฟวิทยุสื่อสารล่วงหน้า; ถอดเบาะหลัง; ฐานยึดอุปกรณ์แร็คหลังคา; เดินสายไฟไซเรน/เครื่องขยายเสียงล่วงหน้า; ไฟสปอตไลท์ (เสา A); ถาดใส่อุปกรณ์กระโปรงท้าย; อื่นๆ
hu: Beépített rendőrségi berendezések: Testkamera-dokkoló/előkészítés; Műszerfalkamera-tartó/előkészítés; Első konzol rögzítőalap; Fegyvertartó/előkészítés; Kutyás (K-9) csomag; Fényhíd előkábelezés; Nincs; Fogolyszállító válaszfal; Gallytörő rács előkészítés; Rádió előkábelezés; Hátsó ülések nélkül; Tetőcsomagtartó felszerelésrögzítők; Sziréna/kihangosító előkábelezés; Keresőlámpa (A-oszlop); Csomagtartó-felszereléstálca; Egyéb
sv: Anpassning av polisutrustning: Dockning/förberedelse för kroppskamera; Fäste/förberedelse för vindrutekamera; Monteringsbas för främre konsol; Fäste/förberedelse för vapenställ; K-9-paket; Fördragen kabel för ljusramp; Ingen; Avskiljare för fångtransport; Förberedd för stötfångare; Fördragen kabel för radio; Borttaget baksäte; Fästen för takräcksutrustning; Fördragen kabel för siren/högtalare; Sökljus (A-stolpe); Utrustningsbricka för bagageutrymme; Annat
en: Police equipment fitment: Body camera docking/prep; Dash camera mount/prep; Front console mounting base; Gun rack mount/prep; K-9 package; Lightbar pre-wire; None; Prisoner transport partition; Push bumper ready; Radio pre-wire; Rear seat delete; Roof rack equipment mounts; Siren/PA pre-wire; Spotlight (A-pillar); Trunk/boot equipment tray; Other
lt-LT: Policijos įrangos pritaikymas: Kūno kameros dokas / paruošimas; Vaizdo registratoriaus laikiklis / paruošimas; Priekinės konsolės tvirtinimo pagrindas; Ginklų stovo laikiklis / paruošimas; K-9 paketas; Švyturėlių laidų paruošimas; Nėra; Sulaikytųjų transportavimo pertvara; Paruošta apsauginiam buferiui; Radijo laidų paruošimas; Be galinių sėdynių; Stogo bagažinės įrangos laikikliai; Sirenos / garsiakalbio laidų paruošimas; Prožektorius (A statramstyje); Bagažinės įrangos padėklas; Kita
sl-SI: Namestitev policijske opreme: Postaja za telesno kamero / predpriprava; Nosilec za kamero na armaturni plošči / predpriprava; Pritrdilna osnova sprednje konzole; Nosilec za orožje / predpriprava; Paket K-9; Predpriprava za svetlobni blok; Brez; Pregrada za prevoz pripornikov; Pripravljeno za zaščitni odbijač; Predpriprava za radio; Odstranitev zadnjih sedežev; Nosilci za opremo na strehi; Predpriprava za sireno/ozvočenje; Iskalna luč (stebriček A); Pladenj za opremo v prtljažniku; Drugo
pt-BR: Equipamento policial preparação: Estação/preparação para câmera corporal; Suporte/preparação para câmera de painel; Base de montagem do console frontal; Suporte/preparação para armeiro; Pacote K-9; Pré-cabeamento de giroflex; Nenhum; Divisória para transporte de prisioneiros; Pronto para para-choque de impulsão; Pré-cabeamento para rádio; Remoção do banco traseiro; Suportes de equipamento para bagageiro de teto; Pré-cabeamento para sirene/megafone; Holofote (coluna A); Bandeja de equipamentos para porta-malas; Outros
pl: Dopasowanie wyposażenia policyjnego: Stacja dokująca/przygotowanie do kamery nasobnej; Mocowanie/przygotowanie do kamery samochodowej; Podstawa montażowa przedniej konsoli; Mocowanie/przygotowanie do stojaka na broń; Pakiet K-9; Okablowanie do belek ostrzegawczych; Brak; Przegroda do transportu więźniów; Przygotowanie pod zderzak ochronny; Przygotowanie okablowania do radia; Usunięcie tylnego siedzenia; Mocowania sprzętu na bagażniku dachowym; Przygotowanie okablowania do syreny/megafonu; Szperacz (słupek A); Taca na sprzęt w bagażniku; Inne
da: Politiudstyr: Dok/klargøring til kropskamera; Beslag/klargøring til dashcam; Monteringsbase til frontkonsol; Beslag/klargøring til våbenstativ; Hundepatruljepakke; Forberedt til lysbro; Ingen; Skillevæg til fangetransport; Klar til kofangerbeskytter; Forberedt til radio; Uden bagsæde; Udstyrsbeslag til tagbagagebærer; Forberedt til sirene/PA-system; Søgelys (A-stolpe); Udstyrsbakke til bagagerum; Andet
el: Συμβατότητα εξοπλισμού αστυνομίας: Βάση/Προετοιμασία για κάμερα σώματος; Βάση/Προετοιμασία για κάμερα ταμπλό; Βάση στήριξης μπροστινής κονσόλας; Βάση/Προετοιμασία για θήκη όπλων; Πακέτο K-9; Προκαλωδίωση μπάρας φάρων; Κανένα; Διαχωριστικό μεταφοράς κρατουμένων; Έτοιμο για προφυλακτήρα ώθησης; Προκαλωδίωση ασυρμάτου; Αφαίρεση πίσω καθίσματος; Βάσεις εξοπλισμού σχάρας οροφής; Προκαλωδίωση σειρήνας/PA; Προβολέας (Κολόνα Α); Συρτάρι εξοπλισμού πορτμπαγκάζ; Άλλο
ko: 경찰 장비 장착: 바디 카메라 도킹/준비; 대시 캠 마운트/준비; 전면 콘솔 마운팅 베이스; 총기 랙 마운트/준비; K-9 패키지; 라이트바 사전 배선; 없음; 수감자 이송 파티션; 푸시 범퍼 준비; 무전기 사전 배선; 뒷좌석 제거; 루프 랙 장비 마운트; 사이렌/PA 사전 배선; 스포트라이트(A필러); 트렁크/부트 장비 트레이; 기타
sk-SK: Inštalácia pre policajné vybavenie: Dokovanie/príprava na telovú kameru; Montáž/príprava na palubnú kameru; Montážna základňa na prednej konzole; Montáž/príprava na stojan na zbrane; Balík K-9; Príprava kabeláže pre svetelnú rampu; Žiadne; Priečka na transport väzňov; Pripravené na ochranný rám; Príprava kabeláže na rádio; Odstránené zadné sedadlá; Držiaky na vybavenie na strešnom nosiči; Príprava kabeláže na sirénu/PA; Hľadací reflektor (A-stĺpik); Priehradka na vybavenie v kufri; Iné
hr-HR: Ugradnja opreme za policiju: Priprema / postolje za kameru na tijelu; Priprema / nosač za auto-kameru (dashcam); Baza za montažu prednje konzole; Priprema / nosač za oružje; K-9 paket (za policijske pse); Ožičenje za rotirku; Nema; Pregrada za prijevoz zatvorenika; Priprema za zaštitni odbojnik (push bumper); Ožičenje za radio; Bez stražnjih sjedala; Nosači za krovnu opremu; Ožičenje za sirenu / razglas; Reflektor (A-stup); Ladica za opremu u prtljažniku; Ostalo
ru: Оснащение полицейского транспорта: Док-станция/подготовка для нагрудной камеры; Крепление/подготовка для видеорегистратора; Основание для крепления на передней консоли; Крепление/подготовка для оружейной стойки; Пакет для кинологической службы; Предварительная проводка для световой панели; Нет; Перегородка для перевозки задержанных; Подготовка для таранного бампера; Предварительная проводка для радиостанции; Удаление заднего сиденья; Крепления для оборудования на багажнике на крыше; Предварительная проводка для сирены/громкоговорителя; Прожектор (передняя стойка); Лоток для оборудования в багажнике; Другое
pt-PT: Equipamento policial: Base/preparação para câmara corporal; Suporte/preparação para câmara de tablier; Base de montagem na consola frontal; Suporte/preparação para suporte de armas; Pacote K-9; Pré-cablagem para barra de luzes; Nenhum; Divisória para transporte de prisioneiros; Preparação para para-choques de impulsão; Pré-cablagem para rádio; Remoção do banco traseiro; Suportes de equipamento para barras de tejadilho; Pré-cablagem para sirene/sistema de som; Foco (pilar A); Bandeja de equipamento para porta-bagagens; Outro
fr: Compatibilité avec l’équipement de police: Station d’accueil/préparation pour caméra corporelle; Support/préparation pour caméra embarquée; Base de montage pour console avant; Support/préparation pour râtelier d’armes; Ensemble canin (K-9); Pré-câblage pour rampe lumineuse; Aucun; Cloison de séparation pour transport de prisonniers; Préparation pour pare-buffles; Pré-câblage pour radio; Suppression de la banquette arrière; Supports d’équipement pour galerie de toit; Pré-câblage pour sirène/système de sonorisation; Phare de recherche (montant A); Plateau d’équipement pour coffre; Autre
it: Allestimento per attrezzature delle forze dell'ordine: Docking station/predisposizione per body cam; Supporto/predisposizione per dash cam; Base di montaggio console anteriore; Supporto/predisposizione per portafucili; Pacchetto K-9; Precablaggio barra luminosa; Nessuno; Divisorio per trasporto prigionieri; Predisposizione per paracolpi; Precablaggio radio; Rimozione sedile posteriore; Supporti per attrezzatura su portapacchi; Precablaggio sirena/megafono; Faro di ricerca (montante anteriore); Vano per attrezzatura nel bagagliaio; Altro
nb: Montering av politiutstyr: Dokking/klargjøring for kroppskamera; Feste/klargjøring for dashbordkamera; Monteringsbase for frontkonsoll; Feste/klargjøring for våpenstativ; Hundepatruljepakke; Forhåndskablet for lysbro; Ingen; Skillevegg for fangetransport; Klargjort for kufanger; Forhåndskablet for radio; Fjerning av baksete; Utstyrsfester for takstativ; Forhåndskablet for sirene/PA-system; Søkelys (A-stolpe); Utstyrsbrett i bagasjerom; Annet
ja: 警察装備の取り付け: ボディカメラ用ドッキング/プレップ; ダッシュボードカメラ用マウント/プレップ; フロントコンソールマウントベース; ガンラック用マウント/プレップ; 警察犬用パッケージ; ライトバー用事前配線; なし; 護送用パーティション; プッシュバンパー対応; 無線用事前配線; 後部座席取り外し; ルーフラック装備用マウント; サイレン/PA用事前配線; スポットライト (Aピラー); トランク装備用トレイ; その他